Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-168.02
Board of adjustment; decision; appeal.

(1) An appeal to the board of adjustment may be taken by any person or persons aggrieved, or by any officer, department, board, or bureau of the county affected by any decision of an administrative officer or planning commission. Such appeal shall be taken within a reasonable time, as provided by the rules of the board of adjustment, by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds thereof. The officer or agency from whom the appeal is taken shall transmit to the board of adjustment all the papers constituting the record upon which the action appealed from was taken.

(2) The board of adjustment shall fix a reasonable time for the hearing of the appeal, give public notice thereof as well as due notice to the parties in interest, and decide the same within a reasonable time. Any party may appear at the hearing in person, by agent, or by attorney.

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 9, p. 372.

The specific statutory procedure for appealing local administrative decisions to a board of adjustment foreclosed a landowner's ability to appeal by a petition in error the county board of supervisors' denial of a conditional use permit. Mogensen v. Board of Supervisors, 268 Neb. 26, 679 N.W.2d 413 (2004).

One who enjoys benefit of zoning variance is entitled to notice and hearing before change. Adler v. Lynch, 415 F.Supp. 705 (D. Neb. 1976).